ko: 색소폰 마우스피스 배플 유형: 오목형; 평면형; 하이 스텝; 없음; 롤오버; 스텝; 기타
pl: Typ przegrody ustnika saksofonowego: Wklęsła; Płaska; Wysoki schodek; Brak; Roll-over; Schodek (step); Inna
ja: サックス用マウスピースのバッフルタイプ: コンケーブ; フラット; ハイステップ; なし; ロールオーバー; ステップ; その他
en: Saxophone mouthpiece baffle type: Concave; Flat; High step; None; Roll-over; Step; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de defletor do bocal do saxofone: Côncavo; Plano; Degrau alto; Nenhum; Roll-over; Degrau; Outro
ru: Тип баффла мундштука саксофона: Вогнутый; Плоский; Высокая ступенька; Без моста; Закругленный; Ступенчатый; Другой
ro-RO: Tipul de deflector al muștiucului de saxofon: Concav; Plat; Treaptă înaltă; Fără; Roll-over; Treaptă; Altele
cs: Typ pohlcovače náustku pro saxofon: Konkávní; Plochý; Vysoký stupeň; Žádný; Překlápěcí; Stupňovitý; Jiné
fr: Type de déflecteur du bec de saxophone: Concave; Plat; Marche haute; Aucun; Arrondi (roll-over); À marche; Autre
hu: Szaxofonfúvóka-terelőlap típusa: Konkáv; Lapos; Magas lépcsős; Nincs; Roll-over; Lépcsős; Egyéb
da: Saxofonbaffles type resonansskærm: Konkav; Flad; Høj step; Ingen; Roll-over; Step; Andet
nb: Baffeltype for saksofonmunnstykke: Konkav; Flat; Høyt trinn; Ingen; Roll-over; Trinn; Annet
nl: Saxofoon mondstuk baffletype: Concaaf; Vlak; High step; Geen; Roll-over; Step; Overige
pt-BR: Saxofone boquilha tipo de defletor: Côncavo; Plano; Degrau alto; Nenhum; Rollover; Degrau; Outros
de: Baffle-Typ des Saxophonmundstücks: Konkav; Flach; Hohe Stufe; Keine; Roll-Over; Stufe; Sonstige
bg-BG: Вид на вътрешната преграда на мундщука на саксофона: Вдлъбнат; Плосък; Високо стъпало; Няма; Заоблен; Стъпаловиден; Друго
hr-HR: Usnik za saksofon, tip pregrade: Konkavno; Ravno; Visoka stepenica; Nema; Roll-over; Stepenica; Ostalo
vi: Ống ngậm kèn saxophone kiểu vách ngăn: Lõm; Phẳng; Bậc cao; Không có; Cuộn; Bậc; Khác
sv: Saxofonmunstycke, baffeltyp: Konkav; Platt; Hög klack; Ingen; Roll-over; Klack; Övrigt
lt-LT: Saksofono kandiklio pertvaros tipas: Įgaubtas; Plokščias; Aukšta pakopa; Nėra; Lenktas; Pakopinis; Kita
tr: Saksafon ağızlığı bölme tipi: İçbükey; Düz; Yüksek kademeli; Yok; Roll-over; Kademeli; Diğer
zh-CN: 萨克斯笛头反射板类型: 凹形; 平形; 高阶; 无; 翻卷形; 阶梯形; 其他
it: Tipo di deflettore per bocchino del sassofono: Concavo; Piatto; A gradino alto; Nessuno; Arrotondato (Roll-over); A gradino; Altro
sl-SI: Opisuje zasnovo deflektorja, ki oblikuje pretok zraka in svetlost tona.: Konkavno; Ravno; Visoka stopnica; Brez; Povezano z ukrivljenostjo (Roll-over); Stopnica; Drugo
el: Τύπος εσωτερικού διαφράγματος επιστομίου σαξοφώνου: Κοίλο; Επίπεδο; Υψηλό σκαλοπάτι (High step); Κανένα; Roll-over; Σκαλοπάτι (Step); Άλλο
es: Tipo de deflector de la boquilla del saxofón: Cóncavo; Plano; Escalón alto; Ninguno; Roll-over; Escalón; Otro
fi: Saksofonin suukappaleen bafflen tyyppi: Kovera; Tasainen; Korkea askelma; Ei mitään; Roll-over; Askelma; Muu
th: ปากเป่าแซกโซโฟนแบบแผ่นกั้น: เว้า; แบน; สเต็ปสูง; ไม่มี; โรลโอเวอร์; สเต็ป; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ prepážky náustku saxofónu: Konkávna; Plochá; Vysoký stupeň; Žiadna; Roll-over; Schodík; Iné
zh-TW: 薩克斯風吹嘴導流板類型: 凹形反射板; 平面反射板; 高階梯反射板; 無; 翻轉式反射板; 階梯式反射板; 其他